Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “treatment works”  has the meaning given that
term in ORS 454.010.
(2) The prohibitions of ORS 468B.050 (1)(b) do not apply to the construction and installa-
tion of a publicly owned treatment works located within the North Santiam Basin if:
(a) Construction of the treatment works is commenced on or after April 15,  2025, and
before June 16, 2025; and
(b)(A) The owner of the treatment works  does not operate the treatment works or dis-
charge any wastes or pollutants into the waters of the state without  holding an applicable
permit issued by the Director of the Department  of Environmental Quality under ORS
468B.050; and
(B) Any discharges from the treatment works meet  the terms and conditions of the
permit.
(3) Subsection (2) of this  section does not eliminate the need for the owner of the treat-
ment works to obtain  any other applicable permit, including but not limited to a construction
stormwater permit.
(4) The Department of  Environmental Quality may require that a treatment works con-
structed without a permit, as described in subsection (2) of  this section, be modified to sat-
isfy the terms and conditions of a permit ultimately issued  to the facility under ORS
468B.050.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1189 (SB 1189-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1189 (SB 1189-INTRO) Page 2